Utah statutes.
20A-12-302.   Campaign committee required.
(1) (a)  When permitted to do so by the Code of Judicial Conduct promulgated
by the Utah Supreme Court, and if the judge chooses to solicit contributions
or make expenditures to promote his retention, the judge may establish no more
than one retention election personal campaign committee, consisting of one or
more persons, to receive contributions, make expenditures, and shall file
reports connected with the judge's retention election campaign.
(b)  A judge or person acting in concert with or with the knowledge of the
judge may not receive any contributions or make any expenditures other than
through the personal campaign committee established under this section.
(2) (a)  The judge shall file with the lieutenant governor a signed written
statement containing the name and address of each member and the secretary of
the judge's personal campaign committee.
(b)  The judge may change the membership of the personal campaign committee at
any time by filing with the lieutenant governor a signed statement containing
the name and address of any additional members and identifying any members
that have been removed from the committee.
(c)  The judge or the judge's personal campaign committee may not make any
expenditures on behalf of the judge until the statement has been filed.
(3) (a)  The judge's personal campaign committee may not make an expenditure
of more than $1,000 unless the judge or the secretary of the personal campaign
committee authorizes the expenditure in writing.
(b)  A judge or the judge's personal campaign committee may not make any
expenditures prohibited by law.
(4)  A judge's personal campaign committee is dissolved on the date that the
summary report required by Section 20A-12-304 is filed.
